src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON _OSH-SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx
+Sg+Def:%>{оеэØ}нть NounEnd_K ; 
 NounEnd_K ; 







!LEXICON Nouns1_A
! Possessive-NomGen ;

!+Abe:%>вт{оеэ}мО1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Abl:%>{дт}О1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Cmpr:%>{оеэØ}шка _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Prl:%>Г2а _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Tra:%>{оеэØ}кс _OSH-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ill:%>{оеэØ}з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;

!+Temp+Indef:%>нЕ3 NounEnd_K ;
!+Lat+Indef:%>{оеэØ}в NounEnd_K ;

!+Dat+Indef:%>нень NounEnd_K ;
! DAT-PX ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>{оеэØ}сь NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>{оеэØ}сь CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>{оеэØ}нть NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Dat+Def:%>{оеэØ}нтень NounEnd_K ;

!+Gen+Indef:%>{оеэØ}нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Com+Indef:%>нек K-lak ;

!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ill:%>з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з{оэØ} NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з{оэØ} CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Nom+PxPl1:%>н{оеэ}к _LAK-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Gen+PxPl1:%>н{оеэ}к _LAK-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь NounEnd_K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Gen+Def:%>сть NounEnd_K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Dat+Def:%>стень NounEnd_K ;


!! Nouns1S_A
!HERE

!LEXICON Nouns1S_A_ReqVow
! Possessive-NomGen ;

!+Ine:%>{оеэØ}%>с{оэØ} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ela:%>{оеэØ}%>ст{оэØ} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Cmpr:%>{оеэØ}шка _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ill:%>{оеэØ}%>с NounEnd_K ;

!+Lat+Indef:%>{оеэØ}в NounEnd_K ;


!+Ine:%>с{оэØ} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ela:%>ст{оэØ} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Cmpr:%>шка _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Tra:%>{оеэØ}кс _OSH-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ill:%>с NounEnd_K ;

!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Gen+Def:%>{оеэØ}сть NounEnd_K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Dat+Def:%>{оеэØ}стень NounEnd_K ;

! DAT-PX ;

!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>{оеэØ}сь NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>{оеэØ}сь CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>{оеэØ}нть NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Dat+Def:%>{оеэØ}нтень NounEnd_K ;
!+Gen+Indef:%>{оеэØ}нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;



!LEXICON Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow
!+Abl:%>{дт}О1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Prl:%>Г2а _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Abe:%>вт{оеэ}мО1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Dat+PxSg2:%>теть NounEnd_K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Dat+PxSg2:%>те NounEnd_K ;
!+Dat+PxSg2:%>тень NounEnd_K ;
!+Dat+PxSg1:%>нень NounEnd_K ;


!+Dat:%>нень NounEnd_K ;
!+Com:%>нек K-lak ;
!+Temp:%>нЕ3 NounEnd_K ;
!!!This one would render voiceless "s"
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ill:%>з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з{оэØ} NounEnd_K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з{оэØ} CLT/COP_SG ;
!Nouns_Pl ;





!LEXICON istja-Gen-Attributes
! NounEnd_K ; !!= * __@CODE@__ This means that stem is word final 
!+Abl+Indef:%>{дт}О1 NounEnd_K ;
!+Der/GenAttr:%>нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Der/GenAttr:%>н N2Dem-SE ;
!+Orth/Morph+Der/GenAttr:%>нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension through double %>%>
!+Orth/PhonInfl+Der/Oncje:%>нце N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;


!LEXICON chop-Gen-Attributes
! pek-Gen-Attributes ;

!LEXICON pek-Gen-Attributes
! NounEnd_K ; !!= * __@CODE@__ This means that stem is word final 
!+Abl+Indef:%>{дт}О1 NounEnd_K ;
! GEN-INDEF-LIKE-DERIVATION ;

!LEXICON GEN-INDEF-LIKE-DERIVATION
!+Der/GenAttr:%>{оеэØ}нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Der/GenAttr:%>{оеэØ}н N2Dem-SE ;
!+Orth/Morph+Der/GenAttr:%>{оеэØ}нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension through double %>%>
!+Orth/PhonInfl+Der/Oncje:%>{оеэØ}нце N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;


LEXICON _KUDO-Possessives2-Ill
 _KUDO-Possessives2 ;
+NoVowX+Ill:%>з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;

!LEXICON _KAL-Possessives2
! Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

! These are possessor Indices for non-nominative singular
! NonNomSg
!LEXICON _OSH-Possessives2
! Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Possessives2
 Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

LEXICON _KAL-Determinatives1
: N2Dem-SE ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>це N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;
 _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _KIT-Determinatives1
: N2Dem-SE ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>це N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;
 _KIT-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _LAK-Determinatives1
 N2Dem-SE ; ! +Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>се N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>це N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;
 _LAK-Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON _KUDO-Determinatives1
 N2Dem-SE ; !+Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>се N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>це N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;
 _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;

!LEXICON Dem_
!+Pron+Dem: NounEnd_K ; 

LEXICON DEM_ALCE
+Der+Der/sje: N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;

LEXICON letter-F ! this needs fixing front vowel
+Prop:- PROP_KUDO ;

LEXICON letter-B ! this needs fixing back vowel
+Prop:- PROP_KUDO ;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP_KUDO ;
:%: PROP_KUDO ;
:- PROP_KUDO ;
:%' PROP_KUDO ;


!! ## POSSESSIVE marking followed by clitics

!LEXICON _OSH-Possessive-Before-K-or-K 
! NounEnd_K ;
! _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K-or-K 
 NounEnd_K ;
 _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;


LEXICON _OSH-Possessive-Before-K
:%>{оеэØ} Possessive-Before-K-noArrow ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K
:%> Possessive-Before-K-noArrow ;


!LEXICON N-COLL-PL_
!+Pl+Nom+Indef: # ;
!LEXICON N-COLL-COM_
!+Adv+Com: # ;

LEXICON N-VOC_J/KAJ
 N-VOC_J ;
 N-VOC_KAJ ;

LEXICON N-VOC_J
+Voc:й ENDLEX ;

LEXICON N-VOC_KAJ
+Voc:кай ENDLEX ;

LEXICON N_KAL_AND_KAVTO
+SP+Abl+Indef:до-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Comp+Indef:шка-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:онь-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:шкань-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:с-#кавтос K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:-#кавто K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:шка-#кавто K ;

LEXICON N_LAV_AND_KAVTO
+SP+Abl+Indef:до-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Comp+Indef:шка-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:онь-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:шкань-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:с-#кавтос K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:-#кавто K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:шка-#кавто K ;

LEXICON N_OZKS_AND_KAVTO
+SP+Abl+Indef:то-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Comp+Indef:ошка-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:онь-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:ошкань-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:ос-#кавтос K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:-#кавто K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:ошка-#кавто K ;

LEXICON N_KUDO_AND_KAVTO
+SP+Abl+Indef:до-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Comp+Indef:шка-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:нь-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:шкань-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:с-#кавтос K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:-#кавто K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:шка-#кавто K ;

LEXICON N_LEVKS_AND_KAVTO
+SP+Abl+Indef:тэ-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Comp+Indef:эшка-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:энь-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:эшкань-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:эс-#кавтос K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:-#кавто K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:эшка-#кавто K ;

LEXICON N_KENKSH_AND_KAVTO
+SP+Abl+Indef:те-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Comp+Indef:ешка-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:ень-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:ешкань-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:ес-#кавтос K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:с-#кавтос K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:-#кавто K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:ешка-#кавто K ;

LEXICON N_VELE_AND_KAVTO
+SP+Abl+Indef:де-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Comp+Indef:шка-#кавтошка K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:нь-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:шкань-#кавтонь K ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:с-#кавтос K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:-#кавто K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:шка-#кавто K ;

!! Possessor indices

!! The Erzya language possessor indices or possessive suffixes may be followed
!! by a number of morpheme types


LEXICON PossPX1
:%> PossMarker-then-Clt ;

LEXICON N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG1-SG2
!2022-04-07 N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG1 ;
 N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG2	;
!LEXICON N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG1
!+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>{оеэØ}нь K ;
LEXICON N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG2
+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>{оеэØ}ть K ;
